Tennessee, session 114, HB2445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Each LEA shall compile a list of all school buildings in the district that use natural
gas for the provision of one (1) or more utilities. The list must also include the name of
each entity that supplies natural gas to one (1) or more school buildings. The list must
be posted on each LEA's website no later than October 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2445
012491
- 1 -